Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 5. Regulations and Interdepartmental Cooperation.

§ 63.2-1732.
Regulations for assisted living facilities.

The Board shall have the authority to adopt and enforce regulations to carry out the provisions of this subtitle and to protect the health, safety, welfare, and individual rights of residents of assisted living facilities and to promote their highest level of functioning. Such regulations shall take into consideration cost constraints of smaller operations in complying with such regulations and shall provide a procedure whereby a licensee or applicant may request, and the Commissioner may grant, an allowable variance to a regulation pursuant to §

63.2-1703

.

Regulations shall include standards for staff qualifications and training; facility design, functional design, and equipment; services to be provided to residents; administration of medicine; allowable medical conditions for which care can be provided; and medical procedures to be followed by staff, including provisions for physicians’ services, restorative care, and specialized rehabilitative services. The Board shall adopt regulations on qualifications and training for employees of an assisted living facility in a direct care position. “Direct care position” means supervisors, assistants, aides, or other employees of a facility who assist residents in their daily living activities.

Regulations for a Medication Management Plan in a licensed assisted living facility shall be developed by the Board, in consultation with the Board of Nursing and the Board of Pharmacy. Such regulations shall (i) establish the elements to be contained within a Medication Management Plan, including a demonstrated understanding of the responsibilities associated with medication management by the facility; standard operating and record-keeping procedures; staff qualifications, training and supervision; documentation of daily medication administration; and internal monitoring of plan conformance by the facility; (ii) include a requirement that each assisted living facility shall establish and maintain a written Medication Management Plan that has been approved by the Department; and (iii) provide that a facility’s failure to conform to any approved Medication Management Plan shall be subject to the sanctions set forth in §

63.2-1709

or

63.2-1709.2

.

The Board shall amend 22VAC40-73-450 governing assisted living facility individualized service plans to require (i) that individualized service plans be reviewed and updated (a) at least once every 12 months or (b) sooner if modifications to the plan are needed due to a significant change, as defined in 22VAC40-73-10, in the resident’s condition and (ii) that any deviation from the individualized service plan (a) be documented in writing or electronically, (b) include a description of the circumstances warranting deviation and the date such deviation will occur, (c) certify that notice of such deviation was provided to the resident or his legal representative, (d) be included in the resident’s file, and (e) in the case of deviations that are made due to a significant change in the resident’s condition, be signed by an authorized representative of the assisted living facility and the resident or his legal representative.

Regulations shall require all licensed assisted living facilities with six or more residents to be able to connect by July 1, 2007, to a temporary emergency electrical power source for the provision of electricity during an interruption of the normal electric power supply. The installation shall be in compliance with the Uniform Statewide Building Code.

Regulations for medical procedures in assisted living facilities shall be developed in consultation with the State Board of Health and adopted by the Board, and compliance with these regulations shall be determined by Department of Health or Department inspectors as provided by an interagency agreement between the Department and the Department of Health.

In developing regulations to determine the number of assisted living facilities for which an assisted living facility administrator may serve as administrator of record, the Board shall consider (i) the number of residents in each of the facilities, (ii) the travel time between each of the facilities, and (iii) the qualifications of the on-site manager under the supervision of the administrator of record.

Regulations shall require that each assisted living facility register with the Department of State Police to receive notice of the registration, reregistration, or verification of registration information of any person required to register with the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1 within the same or a contiguous zip code area in which the facility is located, pursuant to §

9.1-914

.

Regulations shall require that each assisted living facility ascertain, prior to admission, whether a potential resident is required to register with the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1, if the facility anticipates the potential resident will have a length of stay greater than three days or in fact stays longer than three days.

During a declared public health emergency related to a communicable disease of public health threat, regulations shall require each assisted living facility to establish a protocol to allow residents to receive visits from a rabbi, priest, minister, or clergy of any religious denomination or sect consistent with guidance from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and subject to compliance with any executive order, order of public health, Department guidance, or any other applicable federal or state guidance having the effect of limiting visitation. Such protocol may restrict the frequency and duration of visits and may require visits to be conducted virtually using interactive audio or video technology. Any such protocol may require the person visiting a resident pursuant to this subsection to comply with all reasonable requirements of the assisted living facility adopted to protect the health and safety of the person, residents, and staff of the assisted living facility.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-223; 1954, c. 259; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-174; 1973, c. 227; 1991, c. 532; 1993, cc. 957, 993; 1995, c. 649; 1997, c. 397; 2000, cc. 804, 808, 845; 2001, c. 161; 2002, c. 747; 2004, c. 673; 2005, cc. 610, 924; 2007, cc. 119, 164; 2020, cc. 829, 938; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 525.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 910, provides:
“§ 1. Certain exception to regulations for assisted living facilities authorized.

“Notwithstanding any provision of §§

63.2-1732

and

63.2-1803

of the Code of Virginia and of 22 VAC 40-71-700 to the contrary, the provisions of 22 VAC 40-71-700 B 1 and C 14 shall not be applicable to any assisted living facility licensed by the Department of Social Services when such facility (i) offers a safe, secure environment in a freestanding self-contained unit for residents who have been assessed by an independent clinical psychologist or a licensed physician as having a serious cognitive impairment due to a primary diagnosis of dementia; (ii) has an individual facility capacity that does not exceed five residents; (iii) is located in a converted single-family dwelling located in an established residential neighborhood in any county having a population of no less than 259,000 and no greater than 263,000; (iv) has at least one direct care staff member in such facility at all times that residents are present who shall be responsible for the care and supervision of the residents; (v) has established written emergency procedures that provide for prompt assistance to the direct caregiver by other staff members who may be located at locations other than the facility where the assistance is requested; (vi) is operated by a Virginia limited liability company that operates at least three such facilities with a combined minimum of 15 residents; and (vii) has provided written notice to the resident and his legally authorized representative at the time of admission that one direct care staff member rather than two are present at all times.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Nursing shall adopt final regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective on or before July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 5 provides: “That the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators shall convene a task force to develop licensing regulations for assisted living facility administrators and submit an initial progress report by November 1, 2005, and a follow-up progress report by November 1, 2006, on such regulations to the chairmen of the Joint Commission on Health Care, the House Committee on Health, Welfare and Institutions, and the Senate Committee on Rehabilitation and Social Services.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Long-Term Care Administrators shall adopt final regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective on or before July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 8 provides: “That the State Board of Social Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 10 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall develop a training module on assisted living facilities, including all applicable statutes and regulations, that shall be used to train all adult care licensing inspectors currently employed by the Department no later than October 1, 2005. Any person subsequently employed as an adult care inspector shall receive such training no later than 60 days following the commencement of employment.”

Acts 2005, cc. 610 and 924, cl. 11 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall seek consultation and information from all relevant agencies of government in its development of regulations and policies to implement the provisions of the act. The Department of Social Services shall integrate into the regulations and policies standards that are consistent with the recommendations of the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services] necessary to ensure appropriate care for residents with mental illness, mental retardation, substance abuse, and other behavioral disabilities. The Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services] shall cooperate fully in the development of these standards.”

Acts 2018, cc. 248 and 686, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the State Board of Social Services shall amend regulations governing staffing of assisted living facilities that provide care for adults with serious cognitive impairments who cannot recognize danger or protect their own safety and welfare to allow an exception to the requirements that at least two direct care staff members who are awake, on duty, and responsible for the care and supervision of residents be in each building at all times when residents are present for assisted living facilities that are licensed for 10 or fewer residents if no more than three of the residents have serious cognitive impairments.”

Acts 2018, cc. 248 and 686, cl. 2 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [March 9, 2018].”

Acts 2018, cc. 248 and 686, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Social Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2018, cc. 248 and 686, cl. 4 provides: “That the Commissioner of Social Services shall not enforce the provisions of 22VAC40-73-1020, as it shall become effective, in cases involving assisted living facilities that are licensed for 10 or fewer residents if no more than three of the residents have serious cognitive impairments.”

Acts 2020, c. 829, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2020, c. 938 was codified as subsection D of this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 673 added present subsection C and redesignated former subsection C as D.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 610 and 924 are virtually identical, and inserted “and shall provide a procedure whereby a licensee or applicant may request, and the Commissioner may grant, an allowable variance to a regulation pursuant to §

63.2-1703

” at the end of subsection A; added the last two sentences in subsection B; inserted subsections C and F; and redesignated remaining subsections accordingly. Subsection F is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 119 and 164 are identical, and added subsections G and H.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 829 deleted “or” preceding “reregistration” and inserted “or verification of registration information of any sex offender person required to register with the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1” following “reregistration” in subsection H; substituted “required to register with the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1” for “a registered sex offender” in subsection I.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 525, effective July 1, 2021, added subsection J.

§ 63.2-1733.
Regulations for adult day care centers.

The Board shall have the authority to adopt and enforce regulations to carry out the provisions of this subtitle and to protect the health, safety, welfare, and individual rights of participants of adult day care centers and to promote their highest level of functioning.

Regulations shall include standards for care and services to be provided to participants; administration of medication; staffing; staff qualifications and training; and facility design, construction, and equipment.

History.

1992, c. 356, § 63.1-194.2; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1734.
Regulations for child welfare agencies.

The Board shall adopt regulations for the activities, services, and facilities to be employed by persons and agencies required to be licensed under this subtitle, which shall be designed to ensure that such activities, services, and facilities are conducive to the welfare of the children under the custody or control of such persons or agencies.

Such regulations shall be developed in consultation with representatives of the affected entities and shall include, but need not be limited to, matters relating to the sex, age, and number of children and other persons to be maintained, cared for, or placed out, as the case may be, and to the buildings and premises to be used, and reasonable standards for the activities, services, and facilities to be employed. Such limitations and standards shall be specified in each license and renewal thereof. Such regulations shall not require the adoption of a specific teaching approach or doctrine or require the membership, affiliation, or accreditation services of any single private accreditation or certification agency.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-239; 1968, cc. 578, 585, § 63.1-202; 1970, c. 721; 1987, c. 698; 1993, cc. 730, 742; 1998, c. 237; 2002, cc. 298, 747; 2011, c. 139; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2013, c. 416; 2018, c. 11; 2019, c. 604; 2020, cc. 860, 861.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 298 amended § 63.1-202, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2002, c. 298 has been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2002 amendment by c. 298 added “or require the membership, affiliation or accreditation services of any single private accreditation or certification agency” at the end of the second paragraph.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 77 provides: “That the regulations of the Child Day-Care Council promulgated pursuant to §§

63.2-1734

and

63.2-1735

of the Code of Virginia shall be administered by the State Board of Social Services and shall remain in full force and effect until the State Board of Social Services promulgates regulations pursuant to this act.”

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 139 added the last paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 75, are identical, and inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph; deleted “or in the case of child day care centers, the Child Day-Care Council” following “The Board” in the first paragraph of subsection A; and added subsection B.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 416 added the second sentence in subsection B.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 11, in the third paragraph of subsection A, substituted “governing” for “shall not prohibit” and “shall not (i) prohibit school-age children from using” for “from permitting school-age children to use” and added clause (ii).

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 604 added the fourth paragraph in subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and deleted the last two paragraphs of subsection A and subsection B and transferred the text to § 22.1-289.046.

§ 63.2-1735.
Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 76.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 77 provides: “That the regulations of the Child Day-Care Council promulgated pursuant to §§

63.2-1734

and

63.2-1735

of the Code of Virginia shall be administered by the State Board of Social Services and shall remain in full force and effect until the State Board of Social Services promulgates regulations pursuant to this act.”

Former §

63.2-1735

, pertaining to creation of the Child Day-Care Council; members; terms; duties, derived from 1987, c. 698, § 63.1-202.1; 1992, c. 661; 1993, cc. 730, 742; 2002, cc. 747, 847; 2008, c. 123; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2011, cc. 691, 714.

§ 63.2-1736.
Interagency agreements; cooperation of Department with other departments.

The Department is authorized to enter into interagency agreements with other state agencies to develop and implement regulations. Any state agency identified by the Department as appropriate to include in an interagency agreement shall participate in the development and implementation of the agreement. The Department shall assist and cooperate with other state departments in fulfilling their respective inspection responsibilities and in coordinating the regulations involving inspections. The Board may adopt regulations allowing the Department to so assist and cooperate with other state departments.

History.

1991, c. 532, § 63.1-178.1; 1993, cc. 957, 993; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-1737.
Licensure of group homes and residential facilities for children.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this subtitle, the Department shall cooperate with other state departments in fulfilling their respective licensing and certification responsibilities of children’s residential facilities. The Board shall adopt regulations establishing the Department as the single licensing agency for the regulation of children’s residential facilities, including group homes, which provide social services programs, with the exception of educational programs licensed by the Department of Education and facilities regulated by the Department of Juvenile Justice. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, licenses issued to children’s residential facilities may be issued for periods of up to 36 successive months.

The Board’s regulations for the regulation of children’s residential facilities shall address the services required to be provided in such facilities as it may deem appropriate to ensure the health and safety of the children. In addition, the Board’s regulations shall include, but shall not be limited to (i) specifications for the structure and accommodations of such facilities according to the needs of the children; (ii) rules concerning allowable activities, local government- and facility-imposed curfews, and study, recreational, and bedtime hours; and (iii) a requirement that each facility have a community liaison who shall be responsible for facilitating cooperative relationships with the neighbors, the school system, local law enforcement, local government officials, and the community at large.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, any facility licensed by the Commissioner as a child-caring institution as of January 1, 1987, and that receives no public funds shall be licensed under minimum standards for licensed child-caring institutions as adopted by the Board and in effect on January 1, 1987. Effective January 1, 1987, all children’s residential facilities shall be licensed under the regulations for children’s residential facilities.

In addition to the requirements set forth in subsection B, the Board’s regulations shall require, as a condition of initial licensure or, if appropriate, license renewal, that the applicant shall (i) be personally interviewed by Department personnel to determine the qualifications of the owner or operator before granting an initial license; (ii) provide evidence of having relevant prior experience before any initial license is granted; (iii) provide, as a condition of initial license or renewal licensure, evidence of staff participation in training on appropriate siting of the residential facilities for children, good neighbor policies, community relations, and shaken baby syndrome and its effects; and (iv) be required to screen residents prior to admission to exclude individuals with behavioral issues, such as histories of violence, that cannot be managed in the relevant residential facility.

In addition, the Department shall:

Notify relevant local governments and placing and funding agencies, including the Office of Children’s Services, of multiple health and safety or human rights violations in residential facilities for which the Department serves as lead licensure agency when such violations result in the lowering of the licensure status of the facility to provisional;

Post on the Department’s website information concerning the application for initial licensure of or renewal, denial, or provisional licensure of any residential facility for children located in the locality;

Require all licensees to self-report lawsuits against or settlements with residential facility operators relating to the health and safety or human rights of residents and any criminal charges that may have been made relating to the health and safety or human rights of residents;

Require proof of contractual agreements or staff expertise to provide educational services, counseling services, psychological services, medical services, or any other services needed to serve the residents in accordance with the facility’s operational plan;

Disseminate to local governments, or post on the Department’s website, an accurate (updated weekly or monthly as necessary) list of licensed and operating group homes and other residential facilities for children by locality with information on services and identification of the lead licensure agency; and

Modify the term of the license at any time during the term of the license based on a change in compliance.

History.

1979, c. 218, § 63.1-196.4; 1984, c. 55; 1987, c. 578; 1992, c. 666; 2002, c. 747; 2005, cc. 358, 471; 2006, cc. 168, 781; 2008, c. 873; 2010, c. 551; 2015, c. 366; 2018, c. 274; 2019, c. 449.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 168, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education, the Board of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now the Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services], the State Board of Juvenile Justice, and the Board of Social Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2006, c. 781, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Education, Board of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now the Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services], Board of Social Services, and the State Board of Juvenile Justice shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2006, c. 781, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Education, Board of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now the Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services], Board of Social Services, and the State Board of Juvenile Justice shall also include in the emergency regulations required by the second enactment clause provisions to implement the requirements enacted by HB 2461 (2005) and SB 1304 (2005) [Acts 2005, cc. 358, 471].”

Acts 2008, c. 873, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services [now Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services], the Board of Social Services, and the Board of Juvenile Justice shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act no later than October 31, 2009.”

Acts 2008, c. 873, cl. 3 provides: “That the Standards for Interdepartmental Regulation of Children’s Residential Facilities (22 VAC 42-11-10 et seq.) shall remain in full force and effect until such time as each Board required to promulgate regulations pursuant to this act promulgates such regulations as required by this act. Upon promulgation of regulations by a Board as required by this act, the Standards for Interdepartmental Regulation of Children’s Residential Facilities shall cease to apply to facilities licensed and regulated by that Board.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 358 and 471 are identical, and inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph and inserted “including group homes” in the next-to-last sentence of subsection A; inserted subsection B; inserted the C designation at the beginning of the last paragraph; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 168 added “of children’s residential facilities” at the end of the first sentence in subsection A; and added subsections D and E.

The 2006 amendment by c. 781 added subsections D and E [now F and G].

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 873 rewrote subsection A; deleted “interdepartmental” preceding “regulation of children’s residential facilities” in subsection B; and deleted “interdepartmental” preceding “regulations for children’s residential facilities” in subsection C.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 551 added “shaken baby syndrome and its effects” and made a related change in clause F (iii).

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 366 substituted “Office of Children’s Services” for “Office of Comprehensive Services” in subdivision G 1.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 274 added the fourth paragraph in subsection E.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 449 deleted former subsections D and E, describing summary order of suspension, and the service, notice, and hearing on the order; and redesignated former subsections F and G as subsections D and E, respectively.

§ 63.2-1738.
Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 446, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to program leaders and child-care supervisors at licensed child day centers; approved credential, see § 22.1-289.048.

Editor’s note.

Former § 63.2.1738, pertaining to program leaders and child-care supervisors at licensed child day centers; approved credential, derived from
2002, c. 848,
§ 63.1-202.02;
2003, c. 467.